Vermont, session 2025-2026, H290.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 902 is amended to read:
§ 902. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(5) “State employee” means any individual employed on a permanent or
limited-status basis by the State of Vermont, the Vermont State Colleges, the
University of Vermont, the State’s Attorneys’ offices, or as a full-time deputy
sheriff paid by the State pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 290(b), including permanent
part-time employees, and an individual whose work has ceased as a
VT LEG #380568 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.290
2025 Page 2 of 2
consequence of, or in connection with, any current labor dispute or because of
any unfair labor practice, but excluding an individual:
(A) exempt or excluded from the State classified service under the
provisions of section 311 of this title, except that the State Police in the
Department of Public Safety; employees of the Defender General, excluding
attorneys employed directly by the Defender General and attorneys contracted
to provide legal services; deputy State’s Attorneys; Assistant Attorneys
General; employees of State’s Attorneys’ offices; and full-time deputy sheriffs
paid by the State pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 290(b) are included within the
meaning of “State employee”;
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380568 v.1